Illinois, session 104th, HB5742.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $350,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to Angelic Organics Learning Center, 8DBA Farmers Rising, for the purpose of costs associated with 9the purchase or maintenance, or both, of a truck, trailer, and 10other equipment for Farmers Rising's Rockford mobile grocery 11store. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.